South Dakota, session 2026, SB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-12-43 be AMENDED:
10-12-43. The governing body of the school district may raise additional revenues,
for general fund purposes only, from property tax through the imposition of an excess tax
levy. The governing body of a school district may impose the excess tax levy with an
affirmative two-thirds vote of the governing body on or before July fifteenth of the year
prior to the year the taxes are payable. On any excess tax levy approved after July 1,
2002, the governing body of the taxing district shall specify in the resolution the year or
number of years the excess tax levy will be applied and the total maximum dollar amount
of taxes payable over the full term of the excess tax levy.
The requirements for an announcement made pursuant to this section are as
follows:
(1) The decision of the governing body to originally impose or subsequently increase
an excess tax levy shall be first published within ten days of the decision;
(2) Publication shall be made at least twice in the legal newspaper designated pursuant
to § 13-8-10, with no fewer than five days between publication dates, before the
opt out takes effect;
(3) The announcement shall be at least three newspaper columns in width and four
inches in length or at least one-sixth of a page in size, whichever size is greater;
(4) The announcement shall be headed with the following statement in a typeface no
less than eighteen point type: "ATTENTION TAXPAYERS: NOTICE OF PROPERTY
TAX INCREASE OF $(fill in amount)." The remainder of the announcement shall
consist of a reproduction of the "Resolution for Opt Out," including the amount that
property taxes will be increased annually by the proposed opt out, the number of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.203.25 2 223
years that the excess tax levy is to be applied, the total maximum amount of taxes
payable over the full term of the excess tax levy, and a statement of the right to
refer the decision of the board to a vote of the people as provided in this section.
The secretary of revenue, in rules promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26, shall
prescribe a uniform form to be used by the school district for notification of taxpayers as
required by this section.
However, the requirements of subdivisions (3) and (4) shall be waived if:
(A) The opt out is for less than fifteen thousand dollars; or
(B) A copy of the resolution for opt out is mailed to every property taxpayer in
the local governmental unit, by first class mail or bulk mail, within twenty
days of the decision to opt out; and
(C) A copy of the resolution for opt out is printed in each official newspaper in
the local governmental unit's boundaries.
For the purposes of subsections (A), (B), and (C), the first publication is not
deemed to have occurred until three days after the mailing is sent or the resolution is
delivered to the official newspaper.
The opt out decision may be referred to a vote of the people upon a resolution of
the governing body of the school district or by a petition signed by at least five percent of
the registered voters in the school district and voters who cast a vote in the most recent
regular school district election or fifty voters, whichever is greater. The petition must be
filed with the governing body within twenty forty days of the first publication of the
decision. The ballot used for an excess tax levy election must clearly state the number of
years the excess tax levy is to be applied and the total maximum dollar amount of taxes
payable over the full term of the excess tax levy. The election must be conducted in the
same manner as a special election conducted pursuant to § 13-16-6.4, except that the
referendum election shall be held on or before October first of the year prior to the time
the taxes are payable.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.